Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4816.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 283. (1) For tax years beginning on and after January 1,
2026, subject to the limitations under this section, a taxpayer
that makes a qualified investment in a qualified business may claim
a credit against the tax imposed by this part equal to 50% of the
qualified investment made during the tax year. A taxpayer shall not
claim a credit of more than $3,000.00 based on a qualified
investment in any 1 qualified business and shall not claim a credit
of more than $3,000.00 for qualified investments in all qualified
businesses in any 1 tax year.
KAS H01751'25 (H-3) kuoi2m


(2) To qualify for the credit under this section, a taxpayer
shall request and receive certification of the investment from an
independent certified public accountant. The taxpayer shall attach
the certification from the independent certified public accountant
to the annual return filed under this part on which a credit under
this section is claimed. The certificate required under this
subsection must specify all of the following:
(a) The total amount of investments made during the tax year
by the taxpayer in each qualified business.
(b) The total amount of qualified investments made in each
qualified business if different from the previous amount.
(c) The total amount of the credit under this section that the
taxpayer is allowed to claim for the designated tax year.
(3) If the amount of the credit allowed under this section
exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that
portion of the credit that exceeds the tax liability of the
taxpayer for the tax year must not be refunded but may be carried
forward to offset tax liability under this part in subsequent tax
years for a period not to exceed 10 tax years or until used up,
whichever occurs first.
(4) The total amount of credits allowed to be claimed under
this section each calendar year must not exceed $10,000,000.00. If
the aggregate amount of claims for qualified investments made in a
single calendar year exceeds $10,000,000.00, the department shall
prorate the amount of credits so that each taxpayer's allowed
credit equals that taxpayer's pro rata share of the $10,000,000.00.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Certified public accountant" means that term as defined
under section 720 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL
KAS H01751'25 (H-3) kuoi2m


339.720.
(b) "Family member" means an individual who is the spouse,
mother, father, brother, sister, child, stepparent, stepchild,
stepbrother, stepsister, grandparent, grandchild, legal ward, or a
legally appointed guardian with a certified letter of guardianship,
of the investor.
(c) "Qualified business" means a business that satisfies all
of the following at the time of the investment:
(i) The business has its headquarters in this state, is
domiciled in this state, and has a majority of its employees
working in this state, and its transactions are limited to
residents of this state under section 77c(a)(11) of the securities
act of 1933, 15 USC 77c.
(ii) The business receives at least 80% of its gross revenues
from the operation of its business in this state.
(iii) The business has at least 80% of its assets in this state.
(d) "Qualified investment" means a cash or a cash equivalent
investment in a qualified business that satisfies all of the
following:
(i) Is not in a qualified business in which a family member of
the investor is an employee or owner of the business or in which
the investor or a family member of the investor has a preexisting
fiduciary relationship with the business.
(ii) Is subject to the uniform securities act (2002), 2008 PA
551, MCL 451.2101 to 451.2703, and is made in compliance with
applicable state and federal securities laws, rules, and
regulations.
Enacting section 1. It is the intent of the legislature to
annually appropriate sufficient funds from the state general fund
KAS H01751'25 (H-3) kuoi2m


to the state school aid fund created in section 11 of article IX of
the state constitution of 1963 to fully compensate for any loss of
revenue resulting from the enactment of this amendatory act.
Final Page
KAS H01751'25 (H-3) kuoi2m